Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1
REGISTRATION AND TAXATION

42-3-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that its purpose in enacting this article is to implement by law the purpose and intent of section 6 of article X of the state constitution, wherein it is provided that "The general assembly shall enact laws classifying motor vehicles and also wheeled trailers, semitrailers, trailer coaches, and mobile and self-propelled construction equipment, prescribing methods of determining the taxable value of such property, and requiring payment of a graduated annual specific ownership tax thereon, which tax shall be in lieu of all ad valorem taxes upon such property; ...".

The general assembly further declares that it intends to classify in this article the personal property so specified, to prescribe methods by which the taxable value of such classified property shall be determined, to require payment of a graduated annual specific ownership tax upon each item of such classified personal property, and to provide for the administration and collection of such tax, and for the apportionment and distribution of the revenue derived therefrom.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1071, § 2, effective August 8.

42-3-102. Periodic registration - rules.

The department may establish by rule a periodic vehicle registration program whereby certain vehicles shall be registered at:

Subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, twelve-month intervals, in which case the registration of such vehicles shall expire on the last day of the month of each twelve-month registration period;

Five-year intervals upon payment of a five-year registration fee and any five-year specific ownership tax that may be due. An owner of any of the following motor vehicles may elect a five-year registration pursuant to this paragraph (b), which registration shall expire on the last day of the last month of each five-year registration period:

A utility trailer; or

Special mobile machinery.

Except for motor vehicles of model year 1981 or older and except for motorcycles of any model year, the department may register motor vehicles at two-year intervals upon payment of a two-year registration fee and a two-year specific ownership tax. The owner of a motor vehicle that is eligible as determined by the department for two-year registration may elect a two-year registration pursuant to this subsection (2), which registration shall expire on the last day of the last month of each two-year registration period.

This subsection (2) shall not apply to class A property that is registered through the international registration plan. Such vehicles shall continue to be registered every twelve months.

The department may register vehicles at intervals of less than one year upon payment of the appropriate registration fee and specific ownership tax in order to allow the owner of more than one vehicle to provide for the owner's vehicle registrations to expire simultaneously. The owner of a vehicle that is eligible as determined by the authorized agent may elect a registration pursuant to this subsection (3). The department may adopt such rules as deemed necessary for the administration of this subsection (3).

This subsection (3) shall not apply to class A property that is registered through the international registration plan. Such vehicles shall continue to be registered every twelve months.

In lieu of registering under subsections (1) to (3) of this section, an applicant may register a commercial trailer or semitrailer under this paragraph (a) if:
(4) (a) (I) In lieu of registering under subsections (1) to (3) of this section, an applicant may register a commercial trailer or semitrailer under this paragraph (a) if:

The trailer or semitrailer qualifies as Class A personal property;

The owner is based outside Colorado in accordance with the international registration plan; and

The owner complies with this section and sections 42-3-107 (28) and 42-3-313.

A trailer or semitrailer registration issued under this subsection (4) does not expire except when the vehicle changes ownership in accordance with this article. The registration expires upon the sale or transfer of the trailer or semitrailer.

The department shall issue a license plate to a trailer or semitrailer registered under this paragraph (a), but a validating sticker or tab is not issued nor required for the license plate.

In lieu of registering under subsections (1) to (3) of this section, an applicant may register a commercial trailer or semitrailer under this paragraph (b) if:

The trailer or semitrailer qualifies as Class A personal property;

The owner is based in Colorado in accordance with the international registration plan;

The trailer or semitrailer is in at least its tenth year of service; and

The owner complies with this section and sections 42-3-107 (28) and 42-3-313.

A trailer or semitrailer registration issued under this paragraph (b) does not expire except when the vehicle changes ownership in accordance with this article. The registration expires upon the sale or transfer of the trailer or semitrailer.

The department shall issue a license plate to a trailer or semitrailer registered under this paragraph (b), but a validating sticker or tab is not issued nor required for the license plate.

Upon the sale or transfer of ownership of a trailer or semitrailer registered under this section, the owner shall notify the department of the sale or transfer. Upon registering a trailer or semitrailer under this section, the department shall notify the owner of this provision. The department shall also notify the public of the requirements of this section on its web page.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article or article 6 of this title, a person may register a trailer or semitrailer under this subsection (4) with a valid certificate of title from another jurisdiction of the United States without filing for a certificate of title in Colorado.

The department shall issue a report to the transportation legislation review committee created in section 43-2-145, C.R.S., by July 1, 2014, detailing the number of trailers and semitrailers registered under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (4) and making recommendations as to the cost-effectiveness of the permanent registration.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1072, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(1)(a) amended and (3) added, p. 500, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1487, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2012:

(4) added, (HB 12-1038), ch. 276, p. 1455, § 2, effective June 8.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act amending subsection (1)(a) and enacting subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 136, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

(2) For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act adding subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 276, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

42-3-103. Registration required - exemptions.

Within sixty days after purchase, every owner of a motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or vehicle that is primarily designed to be operated or drawn upon any highway of this state or any owner of a trailer coach or of special mobile machinery whether or not it is operated on the highways, shall register such vehicle with the department. A person who violates this subsection (1) commits a class B traffic infraction.

This subsection (1) does not apply to the following:

A bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or other human-powered vehicle;

Vehicles specifically exempted by section 42-3-104; and

Any vehicle whose owner is permitted to operate it under provisions of this article concerning lienholders, manufacturers, dealers, nonresidents, and fleet owners.

A person who violates this subsection (1) two or more times in five years commits a class 1 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

An owner of a foreign vehicle operated within this state for the transportation of persons or property for compensation or for the transportation of merchandise shall register such vehicle and pay the same fees and tax required by this article with reference to like vehicles. This provision shall not be construed to require registration or reregistration in this state of any motor vehicle, truck, bus, trailer, semitrailer, or trailer coach that is used in interstate commerce, but registration or reregistration shall be required in accordance with or to the extent that reciprocity exists between the state of Colorado and a foreign country or another state, territory, or possession of the United States.

Every nonresident person who operates a business within this state and owns and operates in such business any motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or trailer coach within this state shall be required to register each such vehicle and pay the same fees and tax therefor as are required with reference to like vehicles owned by residents of this state. This provision shall not be construed to require registration or reregistration in this state of any motor vehicle, trailer, or trailer coach that is used in interstate commerce, but registration or reregistration shall be required in accordance with or to the extent that reciprocity exists between the state of Colorado and a foreign country or another state, territory, or possession of the United States.

Within ninety days after becoming a resident of Colorado, an owner of a motor vehicle required to be registered by subsection (1) of this section shall register such vehicle with the department, irrespective of such vehicle being registered within another state or country. A person who violates this paragraph (a) is subject to the penalties provided in sections 42-6-139 and 43-4-804 (1)(d), C.R.S.

Within forty-five days after the owner has returned to the United States, the provisions of this title relative to the registration of motor vehicles and the display of number plates shall not apply to motor vehicles registered with and displaying plates issued by the armed forces of the United States in foreign countries for vehicles owned by military personnel.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) and section 42-1-102 (62) and (81), a nonresident shall be exempt from registering a motor vehicle owned by such person if the motor vehicle is a private passenger vehicle weighing less than sixty-five hundred pounds and the person is:

A nonresident, gainfully employed within the boundaries of this state, who uses a motor vehicle in commuting daily from such person's home in another state to and from such person's place of employment within this state; or

A nonresident student who is enrolled in a full-time course of study at an institution of higher education located within this state, if the motor vehicle owned by such person displays a valid nonresident student identification tag issued by the institution where the student is enrolled.

Any person who is exempt from the provisions of this title concerning the registration of a motor vehicle pursuant to this paragraph (c) shall comply with the applicable provisions of the motor vehicle registration laws of such person's state of residence.

This paragraph (c) shall apply only if the state in which the owner resides extends the same privileges to Colorado residents gainfully employed or enrolled in an institution of higher education within the boundaries of that state.

The provisions of this title concerning the registration of motor vehicles and the display of number plates or of other identification shall not apply to manufactured homes.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1073, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(1)(c) added, p. 1597, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 50, § 6, effective March 2; (1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1266, § 26, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1487, § 3, effective October 1.

L. 2017:

IP(1)(b) and (1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 17-1151), ch. 98, p. 296, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2558, § 2, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

Section 137 of Senate Bill 09-292 changed the effective date of subsection (1)(b)(I) from July 1, 2010, to October 1, 2009.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class B traffic infraction, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-3-104. Exemptions - specific ownership tax - registration - domicile and residency - rules - definitions.

Only those items of classified personal property that are owned by the United States government or an agency or instrumentality thereof, by the state of Colorado or a political subdivision thereof, or by a service member either individually or jointly with a dependent shall be exempt from payment of the annual specific ownership tax imposed in this article.

An item of classified personal property that is leased by the state of Colorado or a political subdivision thereof may be exempted by the department from payment of the annual specific ownership tax imposed in this article if the agreement under which such item is leased is first submitted to the department and approved by it. Such item shall remain exempt only if used and operated in strict conformance with the terms of such approved agreement.

Registration shall not be required for the following:

Vehicles owned by the United States government or by an agency thereof;

Fire-fighting vehicles;

Police ambulances and patrol wagons;

Farm tractors and implements of husbandry designed primarily for use and used in agricultural operations;

Special mobile machinery used solely on property owned or leased by the owner of such machinery and equipment and not operated on the public highways of the state, if the owner lists all of the machinery or equipment for assessment and taxation under part 1 of article 5 of title 39, C.R.S.;

Special mobile machinery not operated on the highways of this state owned by a public utility and taxed under article 4 of title 39, C.R.S.

At the request of the appropriate authority, motor vehicles owned and operated by the state of Colorado or any agency or institution thereof or by a town, city, county, or city and county may be assigned, in lieu of the distinct registration number specified in this article, a special registration number indicating that such vehicle is owned and operated by the state of Colorado or any agency or institution thereof or by a town, city, county, or city and county, but only one such special registration number shall be assigned to each vehicle. An application for the special registration provided in this section that is made by the state of Colorado or any agency or institution thereof shall be made to the department only. An application for the special registration provided in this section that is made by any town, city, county, or city and county shall be made only to the authorized agent in the county wherein the applicant local government entity is located, and any such special registration shall be obtained directly from such authorized agent. Special registrations obtained under this subsection (4) shall be renewed annually pursuant to the requirements prescribed by the department.

One Class B or Class C motor vehicle weighing less than sixteen thousand pounds empty weight owned by a person who is a veteran and has established rights to benefits under the provisions of Public Law 663, 79th Congress, as amended, and Public Law 187, 82nd Congress, as amended, or is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States who incurred a disability and is receiving compensation from the veterans administration or any branch of the armed forces of the United States for a fifty percent or more, service-connected, permanent disability, or for loss of use of one or both feet or one or both hands, or for permanent impairment or loss of vision in both eyes that constitutes virtual blindness shall be exempt from the imposition of the annual specific ownership tax imposed by this article. Only one such Class B or Class C motor vehicle per veteran shall be exempted.

One Class B or Class C motor vehicle weighing less than sixteen thousand pounds empty weight owned by a natural person who, while serving in the armed forces of the United States, was incarcerated by an enemy of the United States during armed conflict with the United States or who survived the attack on Pearl Harbor shall be exempt from the imposition of the annual specific ownership tax imposed by this article. Only one such Class B or Class C motor vehicle per former prisoner of war shall be exempted. A person who survived the attack on Pearl Harbor shall be exempt from the imposition of specific ownership tax under this subsection (6) only if the person qualifies for a survivor's of the attack on Pearl Harbor license plate issued pursuant to section 42-3-213 (6).

Those items of classified personal property that are owned or leased by an individual or organization that is exempt from payment of Colorado ad valorem taxes shall be exempt from imposition of the annual specific ownership tax imposed by this article.

Either one Class B or one Class C motor vehicle weighing less than sixteen thousand pounds empty weight owned by a natural person who received a purple heart or medal of valor and who is authorized to use the purple heart or military valor special license plate pursuant to section 42-3-213 shall be exempt from the imposition of the annual specific ownership tax imposed by this article. Only one such Class B or Class C motor vehicle per purple heart or medal of valor recipient shall be exempted.

Notwithstanding that a service member has registered to vote in Colorado or paid or not paid taxes in the service member's state of residence, personal property owned by the service member, either individually or jointly with a dependent, while the service member is a resident of another state but domiciled in Colorado in compliance with military orders, shall be exempt from the imposition of the annual specific ownership tax imposed by this article.

The personal property of a service member who is a resident of another state but domiciled in Colorado in compliance with military orders shall be not be deemed to be located in, be present in, or have a situs in the local jurisdiction of Colorado.

A service member shall neither lose nor acquire residency or domicile in Colorado for the purpose of taxation, with regard to personal property of the service member in any tax jurisdiction of Colorado, if the domicile is in compliance with military orders.

The residency of a service member shall not be established solely for the purpose of taxation. A service member shall be deemed to be a resident of Colorado when the service member is not domiciled in Colorado if the domicile is in compliance with military orders and the service member is a resident as defined by section 42-1-102 (81).

For the purpose of voting in a federal, state, or local election, a service member who is in Colorado in compliance with military orders shall not:

Be deemed to have lost residence or domicile in another state regardless of whether the person intends to return to the other state;

Be deemed to have acquired residence or domicile in another state; or

Be deemed to become a resident of another state.

The executive director of the department may issue forms and promulgate rules necessary to implement this subsection (9).

For the purposes of this section:

"Dependent" means a service member's spouse, child, or an individual for whom the service member has provided more than one-half of the individual's support for at least one hundred eighty days immediately preceding an application for specific ownership tax exemption.

"Service member" means a member of the United States armed forces.

A Class A commercial vehicle that was registered in Colorado under the international registration plan, subsequently registered in another state, and then reregistered in Colorado is not subject to the specific ownership tax or registration fees during the period of time that the motor vehicle was registered in another state; except that the owner of a motor vehicle with an apportioned registration may be liable for the portion of the miles traveled in Colorado.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1075, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(8) amended, p. 1509, § 64, effective June 1; (6) and (8) amended, p. 920, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2007:

(1) amended and (9) and (10) added, p. 1322, § 6, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(11) added, (HB 10-1285), ch. 423, p. 2188, § 2, effective July 1; (3)(e) and (3)(f) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1488, § 4, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (8) by Senate Bill 06-172 and House Bill 06-1391 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For Public Law 663, 79th Congress, and Public Law 187, 82nd Congress, see 60 Stat. 915 and 65 Stat. 574, respectively, and 38 U.S.C. secs. 3901 to 3905.

42-3-105. Application for registration - tax.

Application for the registration of a vehicle required to be registered under this article shall be made by the owner or the owner's agent and, if applicable, simultaneously with the application for certificate of title, as required by this section. The application for registration, which shall be in writing and signed by the owner of the vehicle or the owner's duly authorized agent, shall include:

The name of the applicant;

The name and correct address of the owner determined pursuant to section 42-6-139, designating the county, school district, and city or town within the limits of which the owner resides;

A description of the motor vehicle in a form required by the department;

The purpose for which the vehicle is used;

Whether the vehicle is a commercial vehicle;

The notice described in subsection (2) of this section;

Whether the applicant requests that the department should, if it approves the application, mail to the owner the license plate required under this article; and

Any other pertinent information as required by the department, including but not limited to a class B, class C, class D, or class F vehicle owner's or registrant's personal identification number as provided on a state-issued driver's license or assigned by the department.

An application for new registration of a vehicle shall include the primary body color of the motor vehicle. A motor vehicle registration application submitted in person to an authorized agent or department office for a previously registered motor vehicle shall include the primary body color of the motor vehicle.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(c)(I.5) of this section, the department may require those vehicle-related entities specified by rule to verify information concerning any vehicle through the physical inspection of the vehicle. The information required to be verified by a physical inspection must include:

The vehicle identification number or numbers;

The make of vehicle;

The vehicle model;

The type of vehicle;

The year of manufacture of such vehicle;

The primary body color of such vehicle;

The type of fuel used by such vehicle; and

Repealed.

Such other information as required by the department.

(I.5) The department shall not require a physical inspection as a condition for registration of a vehicle if:

(A) The applicant for a new registration for the vehicle presents either a copy of a manufacturer's certificate of origin or a purchase receipt from the dealer or the out-of-state seller from whom the applicant purchased the vehicle and either document indicates that the applicant purchased the vehicle as new; or

(B) At the time of application, the vehicle is currently registered in another county of the state.

For the purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "vehicle-related entity" means an authorized agent, designated employee of an authorized agent, any Colorado law enforcement officer, any licensed Colorado dealer, any licensed inspection and readjustment station, or any licensed diesel inspection station.

The department or its authorized agents shall not register a motor vehicle or low-power scooter unless the applicant has a complying motor vehicle insurance policy pursuant to part 6 of article 4 of title 10, C.R.S., or a certificate of self-insurance in full force and effect as required by sections 10-4-619 and 10-4-624, C.R.S. The requirements of this paragraph (d) apply only to motor vehicles classified as Class C personal property under section 42-3-106 (2)(c), to light trucks that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight, to sports utility vehicles that are classified as Class B personal property under section 42-3-106 (2)(b), or to low-power scooters. The applicant shall provide the department or its authorized agents with the proof of insurance certificate or insurance identification card provided to the applicant by the applicant's insurer pursuant to section 10-4-604.5, C.R.S., or provide proof of insurance in such other media as is authorized by the department. Nothing in this paragraph (d) shall be interpreted to preclude the department from electronically transmitting insurance information to designated agents pursuant to section 42-7-604 for the purpose of ensuring compliance with mandatory insurance requirements.

Any person who knowingly provides fraudulent information or documents under subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d) to obtain registration of a motor vehicle or low-power scooter is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to the criminal and civil penalties provided under section 42-6-139 (3) and (4).

The department shall establish a set of standard color descriptions for use in identifying the primary body color of a motor vehicle. An application that specifies the primary body color shall use the standard color descriptions of the department to identify the primary body color of the motor vehicle.

The owner of a motor vehicle that is required to be registered under this article need not comply with subparagraph (I) of paragraph (d) of this subsection (1) if such owner signs and submits to the department in compliance with this paragraph (f) a written statement of nonuse. Such written statement of nonuse shall include:

The name, date of birth, driver's license number, and address of the motor vehicle's owner;

The make, year, and vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle;

The time period during which such vehicle will not be operated and a statement that the owner is neither operating such vehicle nor permitting any other person to operate such vehicle during the time period stated; and

Proof that the owner currently has insurance coverage under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (d) of this subsection (1).

Upon applying for registration, the owner of a motor vehicle or low-power scooter shall receive a written notice printed on the application for registration in type that is larger than the other information contained on the application for registration. The department shall advise the applicant in the notice that motor vehicle insurance or operator's coverage is compulsory in Colorado, that noncompliance is a misdemeanor traffic offense, that the minimum penalty is a five-hundred-dollar fine, that the maximum penalty is one year's imprisonment and a one-thousand-dollar fine, and that the owner is required as a condition of registering the vehicle to either:

Sign a statement of nonuse under paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section; or

Provide proof of insurance under paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of this section.

The owner of such vehicle or the owner's agent shall, upon filing the application for registration, pay such fees as are prescribed by sections 42-3-304 to 42-3-306, together with the annual specific ownership tax on the motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or trailer coach for which the license is to be issued.

A motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer licensed under article 6 of this title may act as an authorized agent of the department for the purposes of compliance with this section and collection of fees required for the registration of low-power scooters required by this article. When the owner of the low-power scooter complies with this section, the dealer shall forward to the department an affidavit swearing that the owner has insurance, the statement required by subsection (2) of this section, and the fees required by part 3 of this article for the registration of a low-power scooter.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in a civil action for damages or indemnification resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle, a motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, or employee thereof shall not be liable for an act or omission arising as a result of the dealer or employee performing the functions of an agent pursuant to this subsection (4).

Upon finding a pattern of failure to comply with the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the department may withdraw a motor vehicle dealer's or used motor vehicle dealer's authorization to act as an agent of the department.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1076, § 2, effective August 8; (1)(a) amended, p. 693, § 1, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2006:

(1)(a)(II) and (1)(d)(I) amended, pp. 1509, 1510, §§ 65, 66, 67, effective June 1; (1)(d)(I) amended, p. 1015, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(a)(VIII) amended, p. 496, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 1917, § 142, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1)(d) and (2) amended and (4) added, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1266, § 27, effective July 1, 2010.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (SB 14-131), ch. 388, p. 1941, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP(1)(c)(I) amended and (1)(c)(I.5) added, (HB 17-1105), ch. 44, p. 129, § 1, effective March 16; (1)(c)(II) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 367, § 11, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(c)(I)(G) amended and (1)(c)(I)(H) repealed, (SB 18-102), ch. 77, p. 661, § 2, effective August 8.

42-3-106. Tax imposed - classification - taxable value.

The owner of each item of classified personal property shall pay an annual specific ownership tax unless exempted by this article. Such specific ownership tax shall be annually computed in accordance with section 42-3-107 in lieu of all annual ad valorem taxes.

For the purpose of imposing graduated annual specific ownership taxes, the personal property specified in section 6 of article X of the state constitution is classified as follows:

Every motor vehicle, truck, laden or unladen truck tractor, trailer, and semitrailer used in the business of transporting persons or property over any public highway in this state as an interstate commercial carrier for which an application is made for apportioned registration, regardless of base jurisdiction, shall be Class A personal property.

Every truck, laden or unladen truck tractor, trailer, and semitrailer used for the purpose of transporting property over any public highway in this state and not included in Class A shall be Class B personal property; except that multipurpose trailers shall be Class D personal property.

Every motor vehicle not included in Class A or Class B shall be Class C personal property.

Every utility trailer, camper trailer, multipurpose trailer, and trailer coach shall be Class D personal property.

Every item of special mobile machinery, except power takeoff equipment, that is required to be registered under this article is Class F personal property. If a farm tractor, meeting the definition of special mobile machinery, is used for any purpose other than agricultural production for more than a seventy-two-hour period at the site where it is used for nonagricultural purposes, it is Class F personal property, but it is granted a prorated registration under section 42-3-107 to cover the use. The authorized agent shall notify the owner of the farm tractor of the prorated registration. Storing a farm tractor at a site does not give rise to a presumption that the tractor was used for the same purposes that other equipment is used for at the site.

An owner of a vehicle shall not permanently attach to the vehicle mounted equipment unless:

The owner applies for registration of the mounted equipment to the authorized agent in the county where the equipment is required to be registered within twenty days after the equipment is mounted to the vehicle; or

The mounted equipment is power takeoff equipment.

The application shall be on forms prescribed by the department and shall describe the equipment to be mounted, including serial number, make, model, year of manufacture, weight, and cost.

The taxable value of every item of classified personal property shall be the value determined for the year of its manufacture or the year it is designated by the manufacturer as a current model, and such determined taxable value shall not change. Regardless of the date of acquisition by an owner, the year of manufacture or the year for which designated by the manufacturer as a current model shall be considered as the first year of service. The maximum rate of specific ownership taxation shall apply to the taxable value in the first year of service, and annual downward graduations from such maximum rate shall apply to such taxable value for the number of later years of service specified for each class of personal property.

Manufactured homes shall not be classified for purposes of imposing specific ownership taxes but shall be subject to the imposition of ad valorem taxes in the manner provided in part 2 of article 5 of title 39, C.R.S.

If a vehicle and the equipment mounted on the vehicle are the same model year:

The owner of the vehicle and the mounted equipment may register both as Class F personal property; or

The owner of the vehicle may register the vehicle as Class A, Class B, Class C, or Class D personal property and the mounted equipment may be registered as Class F personal property.

If a vehicle and the equipment mounted on the vehicle are different model years:

The owner of the vehicle shall register the vehicle as Class A, Class B, Class C, or Class D personal property; and

The owner of the vehicle shall register the mounted equipment as Class F personal property.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1079, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

(2)(b) and (2)(d) amended, p. 638, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(2)(e) and (3) amended, (SB 10-144), ch. 289, p. 1345, § 2, effective July 1; (2)(e) amended and (6) added, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1488, § 5, effective October 1.

L. 2011:

(2)(e) amended, (HB 11-1093), ch. 258, p. 1132, § 1, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2)(e) by House Bill 10-1172 and Senate Bill 10-144 were harmonized.